Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 4 Boilers, Pressure Vessels, and Water Heaters

8-2-70 through 8-2-75.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 503, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 561, § 1. For current provisions relating to safety standards for boilers and pressure vessels, see §

25-15-10

et seq; repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 2, effective July 1, 1984.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 2 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 1984.